apertium-hau.hau.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Hausa

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>      ! Noun
%<pl%>     !  Plural
%<sg%>     ! Singular
%<m%>      ! Masculine
%<f%>      ! Feminine
%<mf%>     ! Masculine-Feminine

%<sent%>

%>         ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Punctuation ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N-SIRD

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:i   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:ada   # ;

LEXICON N-GULBI

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:i   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:abe   # ;

LEXICON N-KURMI

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:i   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:amu   # ;

LEXICON N-WATA

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:a   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:anni   # ;

LEXICON N-ZOMO

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:o   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:aye   # ;

LEXICON N-TALAKA

%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%>:a   # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%>:awa  # ;

LEXICON N-TABO

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:bo   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:bba  # ;

LEXICON N-TUDU

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:du   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:ddai  # ;

LEXICON N-TAURARO

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:o   # ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%>:i  # ;

LEXICON N-KUJERA

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%>:a   # ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%>:u  # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Nouns

sirdi:sird N-SIRD ; ! "saddle"
gulbi:gulb N-GULBI ; ! "river"
kurmi:kurm N-KURMI ; ! "forest"
wata:wat N-WATA ; ! "moon"
zomo:zom N-ZOMO ; ! "hare"
talaka:talak N-TALAKA ; ! "common person, beggar"
tabo:ta N-TABO ; ! "scar"
tudu:tu N-TUDU ; ! "hill"
tauraro:taurar N-TAURARO ; ! "star"
kujera:kujer N-KUJERA ; ! "chair"

LEXICON Punctuation

%.%<sent%>:%. # ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
